test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_filee_gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - filee - ok : # Noun 'filé' - not checked
     filee+N+Sg+Nom: filee
     filee+N+Sg+Gen: fileen
     filee+N+Sg+Par: fileetä
     filee+N+Sg+Tra: fileeksi
     filee+N+Sg+Abe: fileettä
     filee+N+Sg+Ine: fileessä
     filee+N+Sg+Ela: fileestä
     filee+N+Sg+Ill: fileehen
     filee+N+Sg+Ade: fileellä
     filee+N+Sg+Abl: fileeltä
     filee+N+Sg+All: fileelle
     filee+N+Sg+Ess: fileennä
     filee+N+Pl+Nom: fileet
     filee+N+Pl+Gen: fileitten
     filee+N+Pl+Par: fileitä
     filee+N+Pl+Tra: fileiksi
     filee+N+Pl+Abe: fileittä
     filee+N+Pl+Ine: fileissä
     filee+N+Pl+Ela: fileistä
     filee+N+Pl+Ill: fileissiin
     filee+N+Pl+Ade: fileilä
     filee+N+Pl+Abl: fileiltä
     filee+N+Pl+All: fileile
     filee+N+Pl+Ess: fileinä
     filee+N+Pl+Com: fileine
